Maine, session 132, LD1210.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §464, sub-§14 is enacted to read:
14. Water quality certification of hydropower projects; department
considerations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for the purposes of
water quality certification of hydropower projects under the Federal Water Pollution
Control Act, Public Law 92-500, Section 401, as amended, and licensing of modifications
to these hydropower projects under section 636, in determining whether to issue or deny
certification for the proposed project, the department shall consider the effect of issuing or
denying certification on the State's renewable energy, decarbonization and economic
development policies and goals; the environmental and economic benefits to the State of
the hydroelectric generation provided by the project; and, taking those factors into
consideration, whether issuance of certification for the project is permissible
notwithstanding the project's effect on wildlife habitat and aquatic life within the waters
affected by the project, including affected waters downstream of the project.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §635, sub-§1, as affected by PL 1989, c. 890, Pt. A, §40 and
amended by Pt. B, §184, is further amended to read:
1. Approval. Approve the proposed project upon such terms and conditions as are
appropriate and reasonable to protect and preserve the environment and the public's health,
safety and general welfare, including the public interest in replacing oil with hydroelectric
energy. In determining whether to approve or disapprove a proposed project, or the terms
and conditions upon which the project will be approved, in addition to satisfying the
approval criteria in section 636, the department shall consider the effect of approving or
disapproving the project on the State's renewable energy, decarbonization and economic
development policies and goals; the environmental and economic benefits to the State of
the hydroelectric generation provided by the project; and, taking those factors into
consideration, whether approval of the project is permissible notwithstanding the project’s
effect on wildlife habitat and aquatic life within the waters affected by the project, including
affected waters downstream of the project. These The terms and conditions that may be
imposed by the department upon approval of the proposed project may include, but are not
limited to:
A. Establishment of a water level range for the body of water impounded by a
hydropower project;
B. Establishment of instantaneous minimum flows for the body of water affected by a
hydropower project; and
C. Provision for the construction and maintenance of fish passage facilities.
When the proposed project involves maintenance, reconstruction or structural alteration at
an existing hydropower project and when the proposed project will not alter historic water
levels or flows after its completion, the department may impose temporary terms and
conditions of approval relating to paragraph A or paragraph B but may not impose
permanent terms and conditions that alter historic water levels or flows;
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §635-B, as amended by PL 2009, c. 270, Pt. D, §6, is further
amended to read:
§635-B. Procedures for water quality certification
Page 1 - 132LR2387(01)

Issuance of a water quality certificate required under the Federal Water Pollution
Control Act, Section 401, is coordinated for the applicant under this subarticle by the
Commissioner of Environmental Protection. The issuance of a water quality certificate is
mandatory in every case where the department approves an application for a permit or
general permit under this subarticle. An application for a tidal energy demonstration
project under section 636‑A that is accepted as complete by the department serves as an
application for water quality certification for the proposed project pursuant to the Federal
Water Pollution Control Act, Section 401, 33 United States Code, Section 1341. The
department shall issue or deny certification at the same time it approves or disapproves the
proposed project, taking into consideration the factors specified in section 464, subsection
14. If issued, the certification must state that there is a reasonable assurance that the project
will not violate applicable water quality standards. The coordination function of the
department with respect to water quality certification does not include any proceedings or
substantive criteria in addition to those otherwise required by this subarticle.